Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 35 Home Food Service Sales

21-35-1.
Legislative findings.

It is found that the state of Rhode Island is in need of a regulatory format for the sale of home food service plans to ensure that consumers receive straightforward and informative disclosure as to the identity, quantity, weight and price of their purchase, while also assuring that those within the industry have a clear understanding of what they are required to disclose to a consumer. Disclosure by a simple one page written agreement which shows the price of the food and nonfood items, the price of the service charge and the total price of the plan, along with the document disclosing both a unit price and the item price should provide the consumer with significant and useful information. That information will permit consumers to judge whether or not the price of the food offered for sale is what they want to pay, whether the cost of the services associated with the plan is what they want to pay and whether the total price of the plan is what they want to pay, and thus allow for an informed consumer value decision to be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 99, § 1.

21-35-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following words and phrases have the following meanings:

“Buyer” means both the actual and prospective purchaser, but does not include persons who purchase for resale.

“Contract” means all of the collective written agreements subscribed by a buyer at the time of sale relating to the purchase of a home food service plan, except promissory notes or other financing agreements.

“Food items” means each edible product sold as part of a home food service plan, including, but not limited to, each constituent part or kind of meat cut from a primal source, each kind of whole poultry or poultry part, seafood products, and other like products.

“Home food service plan” means the offering for sale to a consumer of any food item, or food item in combination with any non-food product and/or services, whether or not a membership fee or similar charge is involved, for a total price in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) if either: (i) the item or items are to be delivered to the dwelling of the household consumer, or (ii) the contract is entered into at the dwelling of the household consumer.

“Item price” means the price of a food or non-food item sold as part of a home food service plan computed to the nearest whole cent and exclusive of any service charge(s) and expressed in relation to the appropriate unit of weight, measure, or count of the item.

“Non-food item” means each inedible product sold as part of a home food service plan, including, but not limited to, paper products, health and beauty products, detergents, cleaners and disinfectants, rolls of wrapping, and like products. The term does not include food items and durable consumer goods such as appliances.

“Primal source” means the following cuts: (i) for beef, the primal sources are the round, flank, loin, rib, plate, brisket, chuck and shank; (ii) for veal and lamb or mutton, the primal sources are the leg, flank, loin, rack (rib) and shoulder; and (iii) for pork, the primal source as the belly, loin, ham, spareribs, shoulder, and jowl.

“Seller” means any person, partnership, corporation or association, however organized, engaged in the sale of a home food service plan.

“Service charge” means the aggregate price for any additional features, services and processing associated with the purchase of a home food service plan including, but not limited to, cutting, wrapping, freezing, delivery, and membership fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 99, § 1.

21-35-3.
Contract and disclosure requirements at the time of sale.

The seller shall provide the buyer with a single document, referred to in this subsection as the “written agreement”, which shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the following:

The name, address and telephone number of the seller and the name and address of the buyer;

The date of the contract;

The price of the food and non-food items of the home food service plan;

The price of any service charge associated with the home food service plan;

The total price of the home food service plan including the price of the food and non-food items, and the price of the service charge; and

A statement that the buyer shall have the right to cancel the home food service plan contract until midnight of the third (3rd) business day after the date on which the buyer executed the contract or after the day on which the seller provided the buyer with a fully executed copy of the contract, whichever is later, by giving written notice of cancellation to the seller. A notice in the form provided in federal or state statutes, rules or regulations governing form of notice of right of cancellation, shall be deemed satisfactory notice of the requirements of this subsection.

In addition to the disclosures required by this section on the written agreement, the following disclosures are required to be provided to the buyer in additional contract documents at the time of sale:

A written list of all food and non-food items to be sold, which shall include:

The identity of each item and, where applicable, the USDA quality grade; the primal source; and the brand or trade name;

The quantity of each item;

The estimated serving size by net weight of each price of meat, poultry and seafood item offered for sale under the home food service plan; provided, that these estimates shall not differ from the actual weight at the time of delivery by more than five percent (5%), and that the dollar value of the meat, poultry and seafood items delivered is equal to or greater than that represented to the buyer; and

The net weight, measure or count of all other food and non-food items offered for sale;

A dated item price list stating in dollars and cents the price per kilogram or pound or other applicable unit of measure, and the total sale price of each food item to be delivered. This price list shall clearly and conspicuously make reference to whether there are additional costs disclosed in the written contract relating to any “service charges” associated with the purchase of the home food service plan;

If a membership is sold, a written statement of all terms, conditions, benefits and privileges applicable to the membership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 99, § 1.

21-35-4.
Contract and disclosure requirements at the time of delivery.

The seller shall provide a receipt, for signature by the buyer, disclosing the following information:

The identity of the item, and the net quantity of the contents in terms of either weight, measure, or count, as required by applicable law. The net weight of each food item delivered shall be within the limit specified in §

21-35-3(b)(1)(iii)

; and

The item price and total sales price of each food and non-food item. The item price shall be the same as that specified on the item price list given to the buyer at the time of sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 99, § 1.

21-35-5.
Adoption of regulations.

The attorney general may adopt regulations in accordance with chapter 13.1 of title 6 to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 99, § 1.